Utah statutes.
16-15-103.   Name.

(1)  The words "business trust" shall be the last words of the name of every business trust registered under this chapter.  The name of a business trust registered under this chapter shall be distinguishable, as provided in Subsection 16-10a-401(5), on the records of the division from any corporation, partnership, or limited liability company, and from any business name, or trademark of record with the division.

(2)  A person who participates in the omission of the words "business trust" in the commercial use of the name of the business trust, or knowingly acquiesces in the omission is liable for any indebtedness, damage, or liability resulting from the omission.



Enacted by Chapter 310, 1995 General Session

